Tennessee, session 114, HB2320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-89-110(c), is amended by deleting
the last sentence and substituting:
By January 1 of each year, a copy of the report and a copy of the annual audit
referenced in subsection (a) must be filed with the governing body of the municipality
granting permission to the authority to organize.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2320
012729
- 1 -